Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-8,115
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage individual schools and school districts to adopt policies incentivizing teacher recruitment and retention through policies similar to the Nebraska Teacher Recruitment and Retention Act. Teachers at schools not adopting a recruitment and retention policy shall not be prohibited from receiving a grant under the Nebraska Teacher Recruitment and Retention Act.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 47.
January 1, 2028